Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-514
Community college area board of governors; districts; terms; nonpartisan ballot.

Candidates for membership on the community college area board of governors shall be elected from the election districts established by the board of governors pursuant to section 85-1512. Two members of the board shall be elected from each election district, and one member shall be elected at large from the area. Board members shall be elected for four-year terms. Board members shall be elected on the nonpartisan ballot.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 110.